Nebraska, session 109, LB369.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB369 LB369
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-2101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2101 (1) All persons under nineteen years of age are declared to
be minors, but in case any person marries under the age of nineteen
years, his or her minority ends.
(2) Upon becoming the age of majority, a person is considered an
adult and acquires all rights and responsibilities granted or imposed by
statute or common law, except that a person:
(a) Eighteen years of age or older and who is not a ward of the
state may:
(i) Enter into a binding contract or lease of whatever kind or
nature and shall be legally responsible for such contract or lease,
including legal responsibility to third parties;
(ii) Execute, sign, authorize, or otherwise authenticate (A) an
effective financing statement, (B) a promissory note or other instrument
evidencing an obligation to repay, or (C) a mortgage, trust deed,
security agreement, financing statement, or other security instrument to
grant a lien or security interest in real or personal property or
fixtures, and shall be legally responsible for such document, including
legal responsibility to third parties; and
(iii) Acquire or convey title to real property and shall have legal
responsibility for such acquisition or conveyance, including legal
responsibility to third parties; and
(b) Eighteen years of age or older may consent to mental health
services for himself or herself without the consent of his or her parent
or guardian; .
(c) Eighteen years of age or older, unless in the custody of the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to a juvenile court
order, may make health care decisions for himself or herself without the
consent of his or her parent or guardian; and
(d) Under nineteen years of age and who is committed to the
-2-

LB369 LB369
2025 2025
Department of Correctional Services for secure care may consent to, and
make decisions regarding, such person's medical care, mental health
services, and related services during the period of the person's
commitment to the department without the consent of such person's parent
or guardian except as required in section 71-6902.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-2101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-